Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.400

Domestic partnership registry—Forms—Rules.

(1) The state domestic partnership registry is created within the secretary of state's office.

(2)(a) The secretary shall prepare a form entitled "declaration of state registered domestic partnership" to meet the requirements of RCW 26.60.010, 26.60.020, 26.60.030, and 26.60.070.

(b) The "declaration of state registered domestic partnership" form must contain a statement that registration may affect property and inheritance rights, that registration is not a substitute for a will, deed, or partnership agreement, and that any rights conferred by registration may be completely superseded by a will, deed, or other instrument that may be executed by either party. The form must also contain instructions on how the partnership may be terminated.

(3) This form shall be available to the public at the secretary of state's office and on the internet.

(4) The secretary shall adopt rules necessary to implement the administration of the state domestic partnership registry.

[ 2016 c 202 s 63; 2007 c 156 s 3.]